Washington statutes.
RCW 21.20.190

Time of taking effect of registration statement by coordination—Conditions—"Price amendment", notification.

A registration statement by coordination under RCW 21.20.180 automatically becomes effective at the moment the federal registration statement or other filing becomes effective if all the following conditions are satisfied:

(1) No stop order is in effect and no proceeding is pending under RCW 21.20.280 and 21.20.300;

(2) The registration statement has been on file with the director for at least ten full business days; and

(3) A statement of the maximum and minimum proposed offering prices and the maximum underwriting discounts and commissions has been on file for two full business days or such shorter period as the director permits by rule or otherwise and the offering is made within those limitations. The registrant shall promptly notify the director or such person as the director may by rule or order designate by facsimile, electronic transmission, or telegram of the date and time when the federal registration statement or other filing became effective and the content of the price amendment, if any, and shall promptly file a post-effective amendment containing the information and documents in the price amendment. "Price amendment" means the final federal amendment which includes a statement of the offering price, underwriting and selling discounts or commissions, amount of proceeds, conversion rates, call prices, and other matters dependent upon the offering price.

[ 1994 c 256 s 14; 1961 c 37 s 5; 1959 c 282 s 19.]

NOTES:

Findings—Construction—1994 c 256: See RCW 43.320.007.